Maryland, session 2026, HB0823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Blockchain” means a distributed ledger technology that provides a
secure, immutable, and transparent method of recording and storing data.
(3) “Digital title” means a cryptographically secured token or smart
contract that represents ownership of real property in the State.
(4) “Pilot jurisdictions” means not more than three counties in the State
selected by the State Department of Assessments and Taxation to implement the Pilot
Program.
(5) “Pilot Program” means the Blockchain–Based Real Property Title Pilot
Program.
(6) “Squatting” means the unauthorized occupation of real property by an
individual who does not have legal title, a lease, or the right of possession.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0823*

HOUSE BILL 823
(b) (1) There is a Blockchain–Based Real Property Title Pilot Program in the
State Department of Assessments and Taxation.
(2) The purpose of the Pilot Program is to:
(i) explore the use of blockchain technology for securely recording
and verifying real property ownership; and
(ii) assess the potential for the use of blockchain technology to assist
law enforcement and courts in resolving real property disputes involving squatting.
(c) (1) The State Department of Assessments and Taxation shall administer
the Pilot Program.
(2) The Pilot Program shall begin on or before January 1, 2027.
(d) The State Department of Assessments and Taxation shall coordinate with the
Maryland Judiciary, the Maryland State Police, local law enforcement agencies, and the
Office of the Attorney General to:
(1) create a blockchain registry to record and verify digital titles;
(2) authorize property owners in pilot jurisdictions to opt in to having their
property titles mirrored on the blockchain as digital titles;
(3) provide a secure application programming interface for law
enforcement and courts to validate the status of digital titles in real time;
(4) test smart contract capabilities for title transfers and escrow functions;
and
(5) educate consumers, law enforcement, and courts on how to use the
blockchain registry.
(e) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation may contract with third–party technology
vendors to create the blockchain registry required under subsection (d) of this section.
(2) If the State Department of Assessments and Taxation contracts with a
technology vendor under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Department shall use a
competitive procurement process in accordance with Division II of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(3) A technology vendor under this subsection shall:
(i) comply with cybersecurity standards; and

HOUSE BILL 823 3
(ii) ensure data privacy and interoperability with existing State
systems.
(f) On or before December 31, 2028, the State Department of Assessments and
Taxation, in coordination with the Maryland Judiciary, the Maryland State Police, local
law enforcement agencies, and the Office of the Attorney General, shall report the results
of the Pilot Program and recommendations for statewide adoption to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 9 months and, at the
end of June 30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.